Hawaii statutes.
§209-3 Duties of state and county
department heads. Whenever the governor declares a state disaster all
executive heads of departments and all county and city and county agencies
shall:

(1) Release personnel temporarily from their
respective departments or agencies to work as needed under the direction of the
rehabilitation coordinator;

(2) Expedite the granting of rehabilitative
assistance administered through their respective offices;

(3) Provide the necessary information, records, and
assistance for reporting on the rehabilitative efforts following a state
disaster; and

(4) Give full cooperation to the coordinator. [L
1961, c 189, §4; Supp, §98P-4; HRS §209-3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next